Illinois, session 104th, SB1658.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 515003.11 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/15003.11 new)7    Sec. 15003.11. Release; opioid antagonist. Upon the 8release of a prisoner from a correctional institution, the 9sheriff shall provide the prisoner with an opioid antagonist 10if the prisoner was incarcerated for drug-related charges or 11was identified as having a substance abuse disorder. 12    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 13changing Section 3-14-1 as follows: 14    (730 ILCS 5/3-14-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-1)15    Sec. 3-14-1. Release from the institution. 16    (a) Upon release of a person on parole, mandatory release, 17final discharge, or pardon, the Department shall return all 18property held for him, provide him with suitable clothing and 19procure necessary transportation for him to his designated 20place of residence and employment. It may provide such person 21with a grant of money for travel and expenses which may be paid   SB1658- 2 -LRB104 10693 RLC 20772 b1in installments. The amount of the money grant shall be 2determined by the Department.3    (a-1) The Department shall, before a wrongfully imprisoned 4person, as defined in Section 3-1-2 of this Code, is 5discharged from the Department, provide him or her with any 6documents necessary after discharge. 7    (a-2) The Department of Corrections may establish and 8maintain, in any institution it administers, revolving funds 9to be known as "Travel and Allowances Revolving Funds". These 10revolving funds shall be used for advancing travel and expense 11allowances to committed, paroled, and discharged prisoners. 12The moneys paid into such revolving funds shall be from 13appropriations to the Department for Committed, Paroled, and 14Discharged Prisoners.15    (a-3) Upon release of a person who is eligible to vote on 16parole, mandatory release, final discharge, or pardon, the 17Department shall provide the person with a form that informs 18him or her that his or her voting rights have been restored and 19a voter registration application. The Department shall have 20available voter registration applications in the languages 21provided by the Illinois State Board of Elections. The form 22that informs the person that his or her rights have been 23restored shall include the following information:24        (1) All voting rights are restored upon release from 25    the Department's custody.26        (2) A person who is eligible to vote must register in   SB1658- 3 -LRB104 10693 RLC 20772 b1    order to be able to vote. 2    The Department of Corrections shall confirm that the 3person received the voter registration application and has 4been informed that his or her voting rights have been 5restored. 6    (a-4) Prior to release of a person on parole, mandatory 7supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the Department 8shall screen every person for Medicaid eligibility. Officials 9of the correctional institution or facility where the 10committed person is assigned shall assist an eligible person 11to complete a Medicaid application to ensure that the person 12begins receiving benefits as soon as possible after his or her 13release. The application must include the eligible person's 14address associated with his or her residence upon release from 15the facility. If the residence is temporary, the eligible 16person must notify the Department of Human Services of his or 17her change in address upon transition to permanent housing. 18    (b) (Blank).19    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, the 20Department shall establish procedures to provide written 21notification of any release of any person who has been 22convicted of a felony to the State's Attorney and sheriff of 23the county from which the offender was committed, and the 24State's Attorney and sheriff of the county into which the 25offender is to be paroled or released. Except as otherwise 26provided in this Code, the Department shall establish   SB1658- 4 -LRB104 10693 RLC 20772 b1procedures to provide written notification to the proper law 2enforcement agency for any municipality of any release of any 3person who has been convicted of a felony if the arrest of the 4offender or the commission of the offense took place in the 5municipality, if the offender is to be paroled or released 6into the municipality, or if the offender resided in the 7municipality at the time of the commission of the offense. If a 8person convicted of a felony who is in the custody of the 9Department of Corrections or on parole or mandatory supervised 10release informs the Department that he or she has resided, 11resides, or will reside at an address that is a housing 12facility owned, managed, operated, or leased by a public 13housing agency, the Department must send written notification 14of that information to the public housing agency that owns, 15manages, operates, or leases the housing facility. The written 16notification shall, when possible, be given at least 14 days 17before release of the person from custody, or as soon 18thereafter as possible. The written notification shall be 19provided electronically if the State's Attorney, sheriff, 20proper law enforcement agency, or public housing agency has 21provided the Department with an accurate and up to date email 22address. 23    (c-1) (Blank).24    (c-2) The Department shall establish procedures to provide 25notice to the Illinois State Police of the release or 26discharge of persons convicted of violations of the   SB1658- 5 -LRB104 10693 RLC 20772 b1Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act or a 2violation of the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act. The 3Illinois State Police shall make this information available to 4local, State, or federal law enforcement agencies upon 5request.6    (c-5) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 7release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 8by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 9Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 10Department of Corrections shall provide copies of the 11following information to the appropriate licensing or 12regulating Department and the licensed or regulated facility 13where the person becomes a resident:14        (1) The mittimus and any pre-sentence investigation 15    reports.16        (2) The social evaluation prepared pursuant to Section 17    3-8-2.18        (3) Any pre-release evaluation conducted pursuant to 19    subsection (j) of Section 3-6-2.20        (4) Reports of disciplinary infractions and 21    dispositions.22        (5) Any parole plan, including orders issued by the 23    Prisoner Review Board, and any violation reports and 24    dispositions.25        (6) The name and contact information for the assigned 26    parole agent and parole supervisor.   SB1658- 6 -LRB104 10693 RLC 20772 b1    This information shall be provided within 3 days of the 2person becoming a resident of the facility. 3    (c-10) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 4release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 5by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 6Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 7Department of Corrections shall provide written notification 8of such residence to the following:9        (1) The Prisoner Review Board.10        (2) The chief of police and sheriff in the 11    municipality and county in which the licensed facility is 12    located.13    The notification shall be provided within 3 days of the 14person becoming a resident of the facility. 15    (d) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 16mandatory supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the 17Department shall provide such person with information 18concerning programs and services of the Illinois Department of 19Public Health to ascertain whether such person has been 20exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or any 21identified causative agent of Acquired Immunodeficiency 22Syndrome (AIDS).23    (d-5) Upon the release of a committed person from a 24correctional institution or facility, the Department shall 25provide the committed person with an opioid antagonist if the 26committed person was incarcerated for drug-related charges or   SB1658- 7 -LRB104 10693 RLC 20772 b1was identified as having a substance abuse disorder. 2    (e) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 3mandatory supervised release, final discharge, pardon, or who 4has been wrongfully imprisoned, the Department shall verify 5the released person's full name, date of birth, and social 6security number. If verification is made by the Department by 7obtaining a certified copy of the released person's birth 8certificate and the released person's social security card or 9other documents authorized by the Secretary, the Department 10shall provide the birth certificate and social security card 11or other documents authorized by the Secretary to the released 12person. If verification by the Department is done by means 13other than obtaining a certified copy of the released person's 14birth certificate and the released person's social security 15card or other documents authorized by the Secretary, the 16Department shall complete a verification form, prescribed by 17the Secretary of State, and shall provide that verification 18form to the released person.19    (f) Forty-five days prior to the scheduled discharge of a 20person committed to the custody of the Department of 21Corrections, the Department shall give the person:22        (1) who is otherwise uninsured an opportunity to apply 23    for health care coverage including medical assistance 24    under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code in 25    accordance with subsection (b) of Section 1-8.5 of the 26    Illinois Public Aid Code, and the Department of   SB1658- 8 -LRB104 10693 RLC 20772 b1    Corrections shall provide assistance with completion of 2    the application for health care coverage including medical 3    assistance;4        (2) information about obtaining a standard Illinois 5    Identification Card or a limited-term Illinois 6    Identification Card under Section 4 of the Illinois 7    Identification Card Act if the person has not been issued 8    an Illinois Identification Card under subsection (a-20) of 9    Section 4 of the Illinois Identification Card Act;10        (3) information about voter registration and may 11    distribute information prepared by the State Board of 12    Elections. The Department of Corrections may enter into an 13    interagency contract with the State Board of Elections to 14    participate in the automatic voter registration program 15    and be a designated automatic voter registration agency 16    under Section 1A-16.2 of the Election Code;17        (4) information about job listings upon discharge from 18    the correctional institution or facility;19        (5) information about available housing upon discharge 20    from the correctional institution or facility;21        (6) a directory of elected State officials and of 22    officials elected in the county and municipality, if any, 23    in which the committed person intends to reside upon 24    discharge from the correctional institution or facility; 25    and26        (7) any other information that the Department of   SB1658- 9 -LRB104 10693 RLC 20772 b1    Corrections deems necessary to provide the committed 2    person in order for the committed person to reenter the 3    community and avoid recidivism. 4    (g) Sixty days before the scheduled discharge of a person 5committed to the custody of the Department or upon receipt of 6the person's certified birth certificate and social security 7card as set forth in subsection (d) of Section 3-8-1 of this 8Act, whichever occurs later, the Department shall transmit an 9application for an Identification Card to the Secretary of 10State, in accordance with subsection (a-20) of Section 4 of 11the Illinois Identification Card Act.12    The Department may adopt rules to implement this Section. 13(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 14102-606, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-345, eff. 151-1-24.) 16    Section 15. The County Jail Act is amended by adding 17Section 19.7 as follows: 18    (730 ILCS 125/19.7 new)19    Sec. 19.7. Release; opioid antagonist. Upon the release of 20a prisoner from a jail, the warden shall provide the prisoner 21with an opioid antagonist if the prisoner was incarcerated for 22drug-related charges or was identified as having a substance 23abuse disorder.